Hawaii, session 2026, GM1137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 421J-3.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[•{•]§421J-3.2 [■]-] Cumulative voting for directors. (a)
[■I-f the -a-osoGiation do-eHmento provide -for—cumulative voting by
mombcra,-] If an election is to be held by cumulative voting
pursuant to the bylaws, members may so vote, by multiplying the
number of votes the members are entitled to cast by the number
of positions for whom they are entitled to vote, and [cast the
produet-for a si-nglc candidat-o--er’- diotributo the product among
twe—©r^-fftore—eandidates-r] give all of the votes to one candidate
or distribute the Individual votes among any or all of the
candidates. The candidates receiving the highest number of
votes under this section, up to the total number of positions to
be filled, shall be deemed elected, and shall be given the
longest term.
(b) Unless otherwise provided in the association
documents, cumulative voting shall not be permitted.
2026-3327 HB1678 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO. E
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(c) A director elected by cumulative voting may be removed
by the members with or without cause if the requirements of
section 421J-3.3 are met.
(d) As used in this section, "candidate" means a nominee
or write-in candidate."
SECTION 2. Section 514B-124.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t]§514B-124.5 [4-] Voting for elections; cumulative
voting. (a) [If the bylaws provide for cumulative voting for
a-n—election at a meeting, ] If an election is to be held by
cumulative voting pursuant to the bylaws, each unit owner
present in person or represented by proxy shall have a number of
votes equal to the unit owner's voting percentage multiplied by
the number of positions to be filled at the election.
(b) Each unit owner shall be entitled to cumulate the
individual votes of the unit owner and give all of the votes to
one [fteiftiftee] candidate or distribute the votes among any or all
of the [nominees.] candidates.
(c) The [fiomince or nominees] candidate or candidates
receiving the highest number of votes under this section, up to
2026-3327 HB1678 CDl HMSO 2
iiiiiiiiniHiiiiiiiniiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the total number of positions to be filled, shall be deemed
elected and shall be given the longest term.
(d) This section shall not prevent the filling of
vacancies on the board of directors in accordance with this
chapter and the association's governing documents.
(e) As used in this section, "candidate" means a nominee
or write-in candidate."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3327 HB1678 CDl HMSO 3
■MMIIIHIIililiHMI

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1678,HD1,SD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1678, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
15-26